Mississippi, session 2026, SB2604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is established the Mississippi Volunteer Firefighter Tuition Grant for community college students to be administered by the Mississippi Office of Financial Aid, hereinafter "the office," which shall set the dates and deadlines for applying for an award under this section.  The office shall establish such rules and regulations as it deems necessary and proper to carry out the purposes and intent of this section. (2)  "Volunteer firefighter" means a bona fide volunteer firefighter who is registered with the State of Mississippi or a political subdivision thereof and is an active part-time or on-call member of a volunteer fire department or a volunteer firefighter.  "Volunteer firefighter" shall not include full-time firefighters or career firefighters unless such firefighters are also active eligible volunteer firefighters when they are not acting as full-time or career firefighters. (3)  The office shall approve grants to a volunteer firefighter who: (a)  Is a verified volunteer firefighter as defined in subsection (2); and (b)  Has been accepted for enrollment at any community or junior college located in Mississippi. (4)  The award shall be applied to tuition, rooms and meals, books, materials and fees not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), which be will prorated per term, semester or quarter of the academic year for costs of attendance. (5)  By accepting a Mississippi Volunteer Firefighter Tuition Grant, the student is attesting to the accuracy, completeness and correctness of information provided to demonstrate the student's eligibility.  Falsification of such information shall result in the denial of any pending grant and revocation of any award currently held to the extent that no further payments shall be made.  Any student knowingly making false statements in order to receive a grant shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable, upon conviction thereof, by a fine of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), a prison sentence of up to one (1) year in the county jail, or both, and shall be required to return all Mississippi Volunteer Firefighter Grants wrongfully obtained. (6)  Eligibility for renewal of Mississippi Volunteer Firefighter Tuition Grants shall be evaluated at the end of each semester, or term, of each academic year.  As a condition for renewal, a student shall: (a)  Make steady academic progress toward a certificate or degree, as outlined in the school Satisfactory Academic Progress Standards and certified by the institution's registrar; (b)  Maintain continuous enrollment until completion of the associate degree or certificate; and (c)  Have a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.50 calculated on a 4.0 scale at the end of each semester, trimester or term. (7)  Each student, each year, must complete a Free Application for Federal Student Aid form or a State of Certification as designed by the administering board to determine his or her eligibility for a Mississippi Volunteer Firefighter Tuition Grant. (8)  No student may receive a Mississippi Firefighter Tuition Grant for more than the equivalent semesters or quarters required to complete one (1) certificate or associate degree program per institution. SECTION 2. (1)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the Mississippi Insurance Department, hereinafter "MID," shall establish the Volunteer Fire Department Equipment Award Program to assist volunteer fire departments in purchasing and maintaining equipment.  Such award shall be open to all Mississippi volunteer fire departments. (2)  MID shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  Establish a process for volunteer fire departments to apply for awards under this section; (b)  Determine the annual award to approved volunteer fire departments; and (c)  Promulgate any rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section. (3)  The award shall be used only for the purchase or maintenance of equipment, including, but not limited to, tanks, pumps, hose, hose reels, hose fittings, nozzles, communication equipment, hand tools and protective items for firefighters. (4)  By accepting an award under this section, the volunteer fire department is attesting to the accuracy, completeness and correctness of information provided to demonstrate the department's eligibility.  Falsification of such information shall result in the denial of any pending award and revocation of any award currently held to the extent that no further payments shall be made.  Any department knowingly making false statements in order to receive an award shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable, upon conviction thereof, by a fine of up to Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) and shall be required to return all grants wrongfully obtained. (5)  Eligibility for renewal of awards under this section shall be evaluated at the end of each fiscal year.  As a condition for renewal, a department shall: (a)  Submit a report accounting for use of previously-awarded monies; and (b)  Demonstrate a credible need of continued support. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.